South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4046.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-25(I) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (I) Each early voting center must: (1) have available every ballot style in use in the particular county for that election; and (2) use separate ballot boxes for each individual day of early voting that must be sealed after the close of each day of early voting and remain sealed until the closing of the polls on election day. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----